Missouri, session 2026, HB2748.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 167.720, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 167.720, to read as follows:
167.720. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Moderate physical activity", low- to medium-impact physical exertion designed
to increase an individual's heart rate to rise to at least seventy-five percent of his or her
maximum heart rate. Activities in this category may include, but are not limited to, running,
calisthenics, aerobic exercise, etc.;
(2) "Physical education", instruction in healthy active living by a teacher certificated
to teach physical education structured in such a way that it is a regularly scheduled class for
students;
(3) "Recess", a structured play environment outside of regular classroom instructional
activities, where students are allowed to engage in supervised safe active free play;
(4) "Vigorous physical activity", high-intensity physical exertion designed to
increase an individual's heart rate to at least ninety percent of his or her maximum
heart rate.
2. Beginning with the 2026-27 school year [2010-11]:
(1) (a) School districts shall ensure that all students [in elementary schools]
participate in supervised moderate physical activity to vigorous physical activity for the
entire school year, including students in alternative education programs.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2748 2
(b) Students in [the elementary schools] kindergarten through grade five shall
participate in [moderate] physical activity for [an average of one hundred fifty minutes per
five day school week, or an average of] thirty consecutive minutes [per day] during the
morning session, if feasible, of each school day, as that term is defined in section 160.041.
Such physical activity shall include moderate physical activity to vigorous physical
activity, as measured by a standard heart rate monitor, for no less than twenty minutes.
(c) Students in grades six through twelve shall participate in physical activity for
sixty consecutive minutes during the morning session, if feasible, of each school day, as
that term is defined in section 160.041. Such physical activity shall include moderate
physical activity to vigorous physical activity, as measured by a standard heart rate
monitor, for no less than thirty minutes.
(d) Students with disabilities shall participate in moderate physical activity to the
extent appropriate as determined by the provisions of the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, or Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act;
(2) Each year the commissioner of education shall select for recognition students,
schools,and school districts that are considered to have achieved improvement in fitness; and
(3) [Students in middle schools may at the school's discretion participate in at least
two hundred twenty-five minutes of physical activity per school week;
(4)] A minimum of one recess period of twenty minutes per day shall be provided for
children in elementary schools, which may be incorporated into the lunch period.

[Any requirement of this section above the state minimum physical education requirement
may be met by additional physical education instruction, or by other activities approved by
the individual school district under the direction of any certificated teacher or administrator or
other school employee under the supervision of a certificated teacher or administrator.]
3. For the purpose of determining whether a student has satisfactorily completed
a full course of study each academic year, a school district may elect to designate up to
ten minutes of the moderate to vigorous physical activity required in paragraphs (b) and
(c) of subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section toward the completion of the
student's school term, as that term is defined in section 160.011.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education shall allow a variance
for block scheduling.
Section B. Because immediate action is necessary to increase the physical activity of
children to protect their health, section A of this act is deemed necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared to be an

HCS HB 2748 3
emergency act within the meaning of the constitution, and section A of this act shall be in full
force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✔